Massachusetts, session 194th, H1185.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8UU(b) the following section:-
(a) As used in this section, "health savings account-qualified health insurance policy"
means a policy of individual or group health insurance coverage that satisfies the criteria for a
high deductible health plan under 26 U.S.C. § 223.
(b) A health savings account-qualified health insurance policy is exempt from a
prohibition on cost-sharing requirements for a covered benefit that is required under state law to
the extent the exemption is necessary to meet the criteria for a health savings account-qualified
health insurance policy.
(c) This section does not apply to any coverage required by state law that pertains to
preventive care as defined by regulation or guidance issued by the United States Department of
the Treasury under 26 U.S.C. § 223, with respect to any health savings account-qualified health
of 2

insurance policy issued, delivered, amended, or renewed while the regulation or guidance issued
by the United States Department of the Treasury is effective.
of 2